Hawaii statutes.
[PART I.
VEHICLES ABANDONED ON PUBLIC AND PRIVATE PROPERTY

GENERALLY]

§290-1 Disposition by counties of certain
abandoned vehicles. (a) The counties may cause vehicles that have been
abandoned to be taken into custody and disposed of. For the purposes of this
subsection, a vehicle is "abandoned" if it is defined to be abandoned
by an ordinance of the county in which the vehicle is located. In the absence
of such an ordinance, a vehicle is "abandoned" if it is left
unattended for a continuous period of more than twenty-four hours and it is
unlawfully parked on any public highway or other public property or private
lands defined as a setback, shoulder, easement, or right of way that is
adjacent to or part of a public highway. The mayors of the several counties
may designate an agency within their counties to carry out the functions and
requirements of this section. The term "agency" means any office,
department, or other governmental unit of the county.

(b) The Hawaii public housing authority may
cause vehicles that have been abandoned on any public housing property owned,
managed, or administered by the Hawaii public housing authority to be taken
into custody and disposed of. For the purposes of this subsection, a vehicle
is "abandoned" if it is left unattended for a continuous period of
more than twenty-four hours after a notice is conspicuously posted on the
vehicle that the vehicle is subject to disposal pursuant to this subsection.

(c) At the request of the landowner, a county
may cause vehicles to be taken into custody and disposed of that have been
abandoned on roads for which dedication to the State or county is pending. For
purposes of this subsection, a vehicle is deemed abandoned if it is left
unattended for a continuous period of more than twenty-four hours after a
notice is conspicuously posted on the vehicle stating that the vehicle is
subject to disposal pursuant to this subsection. [L 1949, c 194, pt of §1; RL
1955, pt of §138-32; am L 1967, c 267, pt of §1; HRS §290-1; am L 1984, c 261,
§1; am L 1992, c 238, §1; am L 1997, c 350, §14; am L 2005, c 162, §1 and c
196, §26; am L 2006, c 180, §16; am L 2009, c 193, §§1, 4]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next